District of Columbia statutes.
3-415

Courtesy cards for funeral directors licensed in Maryland or Virginia.

The Mayor shall issue rules and regulations pursuant to § 3-403(i) [repealed] which shall prescribe the terms and conditions under which the District may grant courtesy cards to funeral directors duly licensed in the State of Maryland or the Commonwealth of Virginia. Courtesy cards shall be limited to authorizing a funeral director licensed in either state to enter the District for the purposes of filing the death certificate of a deceased person or transporting human remains to the state where the funeral director is licensed in order to perform funeral services. Courtesy cards shall not permit a funeral director licensed in Maryland or Virginia but not licensed in the District to maintain an office or agent in the District or to advertise in any manner in the District as practicing funeral directing in the District.

May 22, 1984, D.C. Law 5-84, § 16, 31 DCR 1815
1981 Ed., § 2-2815.